Maryland, session 2025, HB0890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–303.
(a) Notification of a change of party affiliation or a change to or from a decline
may be made:
(1) by information provided on a voter registration application by the same
methods provided for registration under Subtitle 2 of this title;
(2) by written notice, signed by the voter and sent by mail or otherwise
delivered to the local board in the county where the voter’s current voter registration
address is located or to which the voter has moved;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0890*

HOUSE BILL 890
(3) by making application in person at the office of the local board in the
county where the voter’s current voter registration address is located or to which the voter
has moved;
(4) by information on a voter authority card or other appropriate form filled
out in a polling place; or
(5) by changing a name or address with the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(b) Party affiliation changes or changes to or from a decline:
(1) shall be processed at any time that registration is open; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, may not be processed
when registration is closed.
(c) (1) If a local board receives a request for a party affiliation change after the
close of registration, the local board shall make the change and it shall become effective for
the next election provided:
[(1)] (I) there is sufficient evidence, as determined by the local boards
pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board, that the request was mailed on or
before the close of registration for that election; or
[(2)] (II) the request was submitted by the voter to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, a voter registration agency, another local board, or the State Board on or
before the close of registration for that election.
(2) DURING A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER MAY APPEAR IN PERSON
AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER OR PRECINCT POLLING PLACE AND CHANGE THE
VOTER’S POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION AND VOTE THE BALLOT FOR THE VOTER’S
NEW POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.